District of Columbia statutes.
2-352.06

Procurement training institute.

(a)

The CPO shall establish and administer a procurement training institute to facilitate a system of training, continuing education, and certification for District contracting personnel. The procurement training institute may:

(1)

Conduct or participate in procurement education and training programs for District employees and others, including persons not employed by the District;

(2)

Conduct, develop, or collaborate with established training or certification programs for the express purpose of providing certifications of proficiency to all participants who successfully complete the designated programs;

(3)

Conduct research into existing and new methods of procurement;

(4)

Establish and maintain a District procurement library; and

(A)

Establish a tiered core curriculum that sets forth the minimum procurement-related training courses to be completed by District procurement personnel.

(B)

The tiered core curriculum shall be designed to develop procurement competency along with a uniform training approach for personnel ranging from entry level contract specialist to contracting officer.

(b)

The CPO may charge a fee for training conducted by the procurement training institute in accordance with § 2-361.03.

(c)

The CPO shall require that District contracting personnel be certified and that they maintain a reasonable number of hours of continuing education to maintain their certification.

(d)

The CPO may allow attendance at a recognized institute to satisfy the certification requirement and the number of hours for continuing education.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 206, 58 DCR 1185

Section 1203 of D.C. Law 18-371 provided that this section shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Section 7015 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203.

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203, see § 7015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-371, § 1203, see § 7015 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
This section is referenced in § 2-361.03.
As to applicability of §§ 2-352.06, 2-358.03, and 2-361.01, see § 2-362.03.